Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 4. Security against search and seizure.

The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers and effects against unreasonable searches and seizures shall not be violated, and no warrant shall issue but upon probable cause, supported by affidavit, particularly describing the place to be searched or the person or thing to be seized.

Cross references. —

As to search warrants in criminal cases, see Rule 41, W.R.Cr.P., and §§

7-7-101

to

7-7-105

.

As to arrests without warrant, see §

7-2-103

.

As to search warrants in connection with juvenile court, see §

14-6-218

.

As to search warrants in connection with controlled substances, see §§

35-7-1045

and

35-7-1046

.

State and federal constitutional provisions compared. —

Constitutional restriction of United States against unreasonable searches and seizures is about the same as constitutional restriction on that subject in Wyoming constitution, and federal courts have, speaking broadly, interpreted such restriction as rigidly as Wyoming supreme court. State v. Hiteshew, 42 Wyo. 147, 292 P. 2,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1930).

The provision of the Wyoming constitution covering search and seizure is different than that of the United States constitution and makes it mandatory that the search warrant be issued upon an affidavit. Smith v. State, 557 P.2d 130,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1976).

The language of this section differs somewhat from its federal counterpart and the court was unable to consider the impact of those differences where the defendant had not succeeded in invoking the independent protection of the Wyoming constitution. Wilson v. State, 874 P.2d 215,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. May 16, 1994).

This section has been recognized to be somewhat stronger than its federal counterpart in that under the Wyoming Constitution it is mandatory that the search warrant be issued upon an affidavit. Hall v. State, 911 P.2d 1364,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1996).

This section is narrower than its federal counterpart and requires a search to be reasonable under all circumstances. Vasquez v. State, 990 P.2d 476,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1999).

Scope of the protection provided by the Wyoming Constitution is the “same as and parallel to” that provided by the federal constitution. Consonant with the Fourth Amendment, the opening of closed containers during an inventory search is permissible if conducted in good faith, pursuant to a standardized police policy, and as long as the search is not a ruse for general rummaging for evidence of a crime; prior Wyoming precedent has permitted inventory searches and the opening of closed containers during those searches.
Johnson v. State, 2006 WY 79, 137 P.3d 903,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2006).

State constitutional issue not preserved. —

Defense counsel's mere uttering of the words “Wyoming Constitution” during arguments on a suppression motion did not preserve for review the question of whether a warrantless search of a vehicle absent exigent circumstances violated art. I, § 4, Wyo. Const., where counsel offered no independent state constitutional analysis. State v. Williams, 2004 WY 53, 90 P.3d 85,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2004).

Search and seizure under state and federal constitutions the same. —

In some cases the court has held that the Wyoming Constitution offers greater protection to its citizens than the Constitution of the United States, but the court's approach in search and seizure cases has implied the reading of the state and federal constitutions together and treating the scope of the state provision the same as that of the federal provision. Callaway v. State, 954 P.2d 1365,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1998).

Section is limitation only on powers of government. —

Constitutional inhibition against unreasonable searches and seizures is limitation only on powers of government. State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Officer's Motivation. —

Supreme Court has previously held that an officer’s primary motivation is irrelevant under this section, so long as an observed traffic violation justifies the stop. Thus, where defendant offered no cogent argument for departing from that precedent, the Supreme Court declined to consider it. Gibson v. State, 2019 WY 40, 438 P.3d 1256,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 2019).

Detention at traffic stop reasonable. —

District court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress the marijuana evidence discovered in her vehicle following a traffic stop because the detention was lawful under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4 as the officer had a reasonable suspicion of criminal activity that justified the extended detention and expanded scope of questioning. Klomliam v. State, 2014 WY 1, 315 P.3d 665,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2014).

Defendant’s motion to suppress was properly denied as the trooper had reasonable and articulable suspicion of criminal activity sufficient to justify the detention and questioning of defendant because the trooper believed that the driver was trying to conceal his identity; defendant eventually admitted the driver’s true identity, thereby revealing that she had previously lied about his identity; while she claimed that the protective order against the driver was no longer valid, her previous dishonesty justified the trooper’s further efforts to verify the validity of that order, and her further detention; and the trooper then asked if there was anything illegal in her car, and defendant admitted that there was marijuana in the car. Rodriguez v. State, 2018 WY 134, 430 P.3d 766,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2018).

The provisions of this section apply to the investigatory stage of a case. —

Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

Locating identification information on trailer parked in public parking lot not “search.” —

The activity of a law enforcement officer, in determining the ownership of missing equipment by directing a mechanic to climb upon a truck trailer parked in a public parking lot, to locate identification information on the equipment on the trailer, was constitutionally permissible. No “search” of the trailer, which was open to public view, was ever made. Pellatz v. State, 711 P.2d 1138,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1986).

Search and mere entrance distinguished. —

A search, as distinguished from a mere entrance, involves an intent to go through and examine for the purpose of finding or ascertaining something. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

A search entails a process of differentiating between objects with an intent to locate a particular object. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

Only unreasonable searches are forbidden. —

State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Wyoming constitution does not prohibit all warrantless searches and seizures, but only those that are unreasonable. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Not all searches and seizures are forbidden, but only those that are unreasonable. Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Whether search is reasonable is judicial question. —

State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Probable cause for the issuance of a search warrant. —

In a prosecution for illegal possession and sale of marijuana, probable cause for the issuance of a search warrant existed where an officer's corroboration of a confidential informant's statements provided a basis that the confidential informant was a reliable and credible source of information, and the affidavit established a continuous, lengthy, and ongoing scheme of drug trafficking. Cordova v. State, 2001 WY 96, 33 P.3d 142,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2001), reh'g denied,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. Nov. 20, 2001).

Search warrant affidavit did not provide a sufficient nexus for a search because the affidavit made no mention of defendant's residence and it did not identify the given address as defendant's residence, the place where his daughters resided, or as a place having any connection to defendant or the alleged sexual assaults.
Bouch v. State, 2006 WY 122, 143 P.3d 643,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2006).

Search warrant was supported by probable cause where a drug buyer told an informant that he had bought drugs from defendant, another informant stated that the buyer was a heavy user of methamphetamine and that he had told her that defendant was his primary supply source, and the buyer's vehicle was observed by law enforcement parked in front of defendant's residence just a few days before the affidavit was executed and the warrant issued.
Schirber v. State, 2006 WY 121, 142 P.3d 1169,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2006).

Search not pretextual. —

Evidence used to convict defendant of burglary was not obtained through a pretextual search, where officers did not depart from routine procedure in searching defendant's home for drugs pursuant to a valid warrant, and there was no evidence that officers' search for drugs was motivated only by intent to find evidence of burglary. Pendelton v. State, 966 P.2d 951,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1998).

Student searches. —

Because students who participate in extracurricular activities are already regulated more strictly, their reasonable expectations of privacy are even more limited than those of the general student population. Accordingly, the legitimate expectations of privacy are reduced for those students subject to drug testing under a school district's policy.
Hageman v. Goshen County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2011 WY 91, 256 P.3d 487,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2011).

Public school students in Wyoming are protected from unreasonable searches and seizures by Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4, but what is reasonable under all of the circumstances must be determined in light of factors such as the age of the students and the school environment; because Wyoming school districts have a compelling interest in providing for the safety and welfare of their students, in order to maintain safety and welfare, schools are afforded the flexibility to impose rules on students that might be inappropriate for adults. A school's role is custodial and tutelary, permitting a degree of supervision and control that could not be exercised over free adults; because of the degree of supervision and control a school commonly exercises over its students, students generally have diminished privacy expectations born of the government's duty to maintain safety, order, and discipline in the schools.
Hageman v. Goshen County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2011 WY 91, 256 P.3d 487,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2011).

Because participation in extracurricular activities is optional, a policy requiring participating students to submit to random drug and alcohol testing preserves an option for a student who choose not to be tested. Such a student can refuse testing while paying a price (nonparticipation) that is serious but less severe than expulsion from the school. A student who genuinely believes that his privacy rights are unduly infringed by the school district's policy may choose not to submit to drug and alcohol testing. He will have to forego optional extracurricular activities, but he is not deprived of the fundamental right to an education.
Hageman v. Goshen County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2011 WY 91, 256 P.3d 487,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2011).

Where a school district, in an effort to address a perceived drug and alcohol problem among its students, adopted a policy requiring all students who participated in extracurricular activities to consent to random drug and alcohol testing and where parents filed suit, challenging the policy as unconstitutional, summary judgment was properly granted in favor of the school district because, while Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4, protected public school students from unreasonable searches and seizures, the testing at issue was reasonable; students were already subject to more stringent rules and regulations than adults and had limited expectations of privacy in the school setting, and the school district had a compelling interest in providing for the safety and welfare of its students and thus had a legitimate interest in deterring drug and alcohol use among students. Further, the policy requiring random, suspicionless drug and alcohol testing for all students who participated in extracurricular activities was rationally related to furthering its interest in deterring drug and alcohol use among students.
Hageman v. Goshen County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2011 WY 91, 256 P.3d 487,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2011).

Home entitled to more sanctity than boat or automobile. —

A person's home is entitled to more sanctity and greater protection, when it comes to deciding what is a reasonable search, than one's boat or automobile.
Alcala v. State, 487 P.2d 448,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1971).

Defendant without legitimate expectation of privacy in homes searched without standing to object. —

Inasmuch as the defendant had no legitimate expectation of privacy in the other two homes located on the same property his home was located on — he was neither in possession of or present in the other homes prior to or at the time they were searched, he had no title to nor interest in the property, which was owned by his sister, and did not regularly visit the other homes — he had no standing to object to the constitutionality of their search. Tompkins v. State, 705 P.2d 836,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 538

(Wyo. 1985), cert. denied, 475 U.S. 1052, 106 S. Ct. 1277, 89 L. Ed. 2d 585, 1986 U.S. LEXIS 659 (U.S. 1986).

People have privacy interest in wallets and other personal effects

that does not disappear because the personal effect has been lost or mislaid. Morris v. State, 908 P.2d 931,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 225

(Wyo. 1995).

Motion to suppress evidence seized as a result of the State's search of defendant's wallet was properly denied where it was on defendant's person when the defendant was told that he was under arrest, and although he then removed it from his pocket and laid it on the kitchen counter directly in front of him, the wallet remained in the defendant's immediate area and it was reasonable and appropriate for the officer to seize the wallet and search it for weapons or evidence. Andrews v. State, 2002 WY 28, 40 P.3d 708,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2002).

Detention after traffic stop to use drug sniffing dog was not justified. —

The continued detention of defendant for a dog sniff of the exterior of his vehicle after state troopers had concluded a routine traffic stop was not justified by reasonable and articulable suspicion of illegal activity and therefore it was violative of Art. 1, § 4, Wyo. Const. and the Fourth Amendment of the United States Constitution. The fact that defendant was nervous, possessed food containers, and gave vague travel plans about visiting friends even though he had been unemployed for two months did not provide reasonable suspicion for illegal conduct. Barch v. State, 2004 WY 79, 92 P.3d 828,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 104

(Wyo. 2004).

Affidavit requirement. —

Search warrant affidavit that did not identify the foundation for the statements contained therein, where statements were not attributable to any particular source, made it impossible to assess the reliability of the statements, and contained insufficient information from which magistrate could find the requisite probable cause. Hixson v. State, 2001 WY 99, 33 P.3d 154,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2001).

Under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4, defendant's motion to suppress was properly denied because defendant did not establish by a preponderance of the evidence that the deputy's misstatement in the affidavits was deliberately false or made with reckless disregard for the truth; and the affidavits, even without the proper date and time, provided probable cause to issue search warrants.
Lefferdink v. State, 2011 WY 75, 250 P.3d 173,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2011).

Defendant's motion to suppress was properly denied as the affidavit established probable cause sufficient to justify the issuance of the search warrant because the affidavit stated that the informant told an officer she had eaten a marijuana cookie provided by defendant; her statement against her penal interest was sufficient to support a finding of probable cause to search; the information in the affidavit described with sufficient particularity the place to be searched; the fact that defendant had so recently delivered the cookies to the informant made it reasonably probable that evidence of those cookies could be found on defendant's motorcycle or in his car; and the officer corroborated the details provided by the informant. Fosen v. State, 2017 WY 82, 399 P.3d 613,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2017).

Affidavit requirement: Remotely communicated search warrant. —

In response to certified questions, the Supreme Court of Wyoming determined that the statutory procedures for a remotely communicated search warrant in a matter involving driving while under the influence of alcohol were constitutional because they complied with the constitutional search warrant affidavit requirements.
Smith v. State, 2013 WY 122, 311 P.3d 132,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2013).

As a general rule searches not made under warrant are unreasonable.

State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

As a general rule a search and seizure is unlawful, except when made under a warrant issued in conformity with law. State v. Munger, 43 Wyo. 404, 4 P.2d 1094,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1931).

Searches and seizures made without a warrant or outside the judicial process are “per se unreasonable,” subject only to a few specifically established and well-delineated exceptions. Kish v. State, 642 P.2d 453,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1982); Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

And burden is upon state to establish that search and seizure is reasonable

in the absence of a search warrant. Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995); Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

Whether search and seizure is unreasonable depends upon all circumstances

of each case. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Reasonableness of search first determined by trial court. —

The reasonableness of a search is in the first instance a substantive determination to be made by the trial court, subject to review. Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

But reasonableness of search is not capable of precise definition or mechanical application.

Each case requires a weighing of the need for the particular search in the public interest against the invasion of the personal rights that the search calls for. Courts must prove the scope of the particular intrusion, the manner in which it is carried on, the justification for its initiation and the place in which it is conducted. Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

When search without warrant reasonable. —

An officer has right to search party arrested and take from his person and possession, and from handbags, sacks, and other things that he carries with him, and from any place to which lawful access has been obtained, property reasonably believed to be connected with a crime and the fruits, means or evidences thereof, and may take property of evidentiary value shown him by the prisoner, and he may take and hold them to be disposed of as court directs, notwithstanding this section. Wiggin v. State, 28 Wyo. 480, 206 P. 373,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1922).

Search of defendant's flock of sheep on government-owned range, and seizure of stolen sheep, was not unreasonable. State v. George, 32 Wyo. 223, 231 P. 683,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 1924).

Trial court did not err in denying defendant's motion to suppress drug evidence found in his shirt pocket where the search was reasonable under all of the circumstances and did not violate Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4 because defendant had been arrested for driving with a suspended license and asked the passenger to retrieve his shirt out of the vehicle, therefore the assisting deputy was justified on the basis of safety concerns in retrieving the shirt himself rather than allowing the passenger to go back to the vehicle. Also, the deputy was further justified in checking the shirt for weapons before handing it to the passenger, and once he discovered a hard object in the pocket, he also was justified in removing it from the pocket before handing the shirt to the passenger. Cotton v. State, 2005 WY 115, 119 P.3d 931,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2005).

The search of an automobile without a warrant, as incident to a lawful arrest, is not unreasonable or unlawful.
Alcala v. State, 487 P.2d 448,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1971).

Facts police officer learned during first few moments of his investigation were sufficient to justify intrusive search after stop of defendant where reason for stopping defendant was different from the articulable facts and suspicion which led officer to implement intrusive measures after the stop. Brown v. State, 944 P.2d 1168,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1997).

In defendant's murder case, a court did not err in not suppressing the evidence seized through a search of defendant's home where the allegedly objectionable entries into the home were very limited and were all within certain exigent circumstance exceptions to the warrant requirement. The status of the victims was not known until an officer's initial entry. Moreover, once it was clear that a double homicide had occurred, the status of defendant became very important for law enforcement safety, and defendant's location, whether or not he was armed, and what type of weapon he was armed with were crucial pieces of information that were immediately necessary to help insure the safety of officers that were searching for defendant. Pena v. State, 2004 WY 115, 98 P.3d 857,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2004).

Detention at traffic stop unreasonable. —

Defendant's detention in a patrol car was not reasonable where defendant was detained and subjected to persistent and sustained questioning that unreasonably expanded the scope of the stop far beyond the speeding offense into a full-blown drug investigation, and where at no time during that phase of the detention did the trooper ask defendant for his consent to that type of questioning or detention. O'Boyle v. State, 2005 WY 83, 117 P.3d 401,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2005).

Detention at traffic stop reasonable. —

Detention was reasonable under Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4 because the totality of the circumstances showed, inter alia, that: the license plate on the vehicle was not on file; the registration had been altered; the license plate number did not match the registration; and defendant appeared nervous when he could not remember the names of the people he had visited. Negrette v. State, 2007 WY 88, 158 P.3d 679,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2007).

Detention was reasonably related in scope to the circumstances justifying a stop where the trooper knew that both men were California residents, were occupants of a van registered in Illinois, that neither man owned the van, and that they were traveling to an exit number on the interstate. That, combined with their nervousness, the presence of air fresheners, overcompensation in reducing the driving speed, and avoidance of eye contact, amounted to reasonable suspicion enough to justify the trooper's decision to expand the scope of the stop.
Marquez-Guitierrez v. State, 2007 WY 155, 167 P.3d 1232,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2007).

Trial court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress evidence of marijuana that was found in defendant's vehicle because defendant's one-time lane deviation, which was extensive, both in time and distance, constituted a statutory violation, and thus warranted a traffic stop; the deviation was eight inches over the fog line for approximately 550 feet.
Dods v. State, 2010 WY 133, 240 P.3d 1208,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2010).

Scope of Warrant. —

Officer's action in inspecting radios and removing their battery packs was reasonable as incident to his search for controlled substances in defendant's home as authorized under a warrant. The serial numbers came into the officer's view upon removal of the battery packs and therefore the inspection thereof also fell within the scope of the warrant because it produced no additional invasion of defendant's privacy interest.
Schirber v. State, 2006 WY 121, 142 P.3d 1169,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2006).

Computer check for outstanding warrants not a seizure of defendant. —

No seizure of defendant occurred under
U.S. Const. amend. IV and
Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4, when an officer stopped defendant as he was walking down the street, asked for his name, and ran a computer check for outstanding warrants; encounter remained consensual because defendant was in no way detained or restricted during the computer check.
Wilson v. State, 2009 WY 1, 199 P.3d 517,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2009).

One's house cannot be searched without a search warrant,

except as incident to a lawful arrest at the house. Goddard v. State, 481 P.2d 343,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1971).

Search of one's residence without a warrant, and not in connection with a valid arrest there, is violative of this section. State v. Crump, 35 Wyo. 41, 246 P. 241,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1926).

A home is entitled to special dignity and special sanctity, and the proper way to search a home is to obtain a search warrant. Goddard v. State, 481 P.2d 343,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1971); Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

DNA collection from convicted felons is constitutional. —

The DNA Identification Record System Act's, §

7-19-401

et seq., purpose in collecting DNA identification information to advance the legitimate state interest in criminal law enforcement does not violate the Fourth Amendment, because collecting DNA samples either from blood, saliva, or hair, through routine, unobtrusive procedures is minimally intrusive, and convicted felons have diminished privacy rights. Doles v. State, 994 P.2d 315,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 1999).

Warrantless search of parolee. —

A search warrant based upon probable cause need not be obtained before a parolee may be searched if there is reasonable suspicion that the parolee has committed a parole violation or crime, and if the search is reasonably related to the officer's duty. Reasonable suspicion requires that the officer be able to point to specific and articulable facts that, taken together with rational inferences from those facts, reasonably warrant a belief that a condition of parole has been or is being violated. Pena v. State, 792 P.2d 1352,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 1990), reh'g denied,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. June 21, 1990).

Juvenile searched without reasonable suspicion of probation violation. —

It is within the court's discretion to allow a probation officer to search a juvenile without reasonably suspecting that a probation violation exists.
In re Interests of ALJ, 836 P.2d 307,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1992).

When warrantless body search permitted without arrest. —

A warrantless body search may be conducted in spite of the fact that the person searched is not formally under arrest when the character of the search is highly unintrusive, the evidence sought will be forever lost absent the search and sufficient probable cause exists to support a formal arrest. Van Order v. State, 600 P.2d 1056,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1979).

Search incident to DWI arrest. —

Characteristics of a DWI arrest for suspected alcohol intoxication permit a search of passenger compartment of vehicle for any intoxicant, alcohol or narcotic, as evidence related to the crime of driving while under the influence. Vasquez v. State, 990 P.2d 476,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1999).

Blood test performed near accident scene admissible. —

A blood test performed at or near the scene of an accident where criminal negligence or negligent homicide is a factor is admissible in a trial for such a crime. Van Order v. State, 600 P.2d 1056,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1979).

Stop warranted based on totality of the circumstances. —

Law enforcement agencies can build upon reliable information which has been supplied by other law enforcement agencies, and as long as the totality of the circumstances suggests that the information has been corroborated in such a manner that it gives rise to the existence of the necessary reasonable-articulable-suspicion requirement, the investigatory stop is warranted. Buckles v. State, 998 P.2d 927,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2000).

Investigatory stop of person warranted. —

The investigatory stop of the defendant was supported by a reasonable, articulable suspicion where (1) the police stopped a vehicle after a registration check revealed that the car's license plates were listed as lost or stolen, (2) the driver stated that he was traveling with the defendant and that he was driving around looking for him, (3) when the defendant walked past the scene, he made eye contact with the driver, indicating that they knew each other, (4) the defendant stopped further up the street and sat down to watch the stop, (5) a large cache of stolen coins was found inside the trunk of the car, and (6) after the driver was arrested, the defendant got up and started to walk away when an officer looked over at him. Martindale v. State, 2001 WY 52, 24 P.3d 1138,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2001).

In a prosecution of defendant for possession of a controlled substance, a deputy sheriff's investigative detention of defendant prior to seizure of the evidence did not violate defendant's constitutional rights. Facts supporting the deputy's reasonable suspicion were: (1) the particular area where defendant's vehicle was parked was known by local law enforcement officers to have a history of criminal activity, including underage drinking, drug use, vandalism, and theft from cars; (2) when the deputy entered the pullout area, he observed a “flurry of movement” in the front seat area of the vehicle; (3) when defendant partially lowered the passenger window, the deputy immediately noticed an “old burnt smell” or “chemical smell” that he associated with drug use, but could not quite identify; (4) defendant's car seat was reclined back, making it difficult for the deputy to see defendant or his hands; and (5) defendant was visibly nervous.
Keller v. State, 2007 WY 170, 169 P.3d 867,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2007).

Investigatory stop of vehicle was warranted,

where degree of particularity in facts furnished by police informant, coupled with corroboration of the prediction of future events, gave officers a reasonable, articulable suspicion that defendant and others were engaging in illegal activity. Frederick v. State, 981 P.2d 494,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1999).

Reasonableness of detention at traffic stop. —

The reasonableness of the detention is to be measured by whether the police acted diligently under all the circumstances of the case and whether the detention involved delay unnecessary to a legitimate police inquiry. State v. Welch, 873 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 25, 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. May 25, 1994).

Court, in defendants' drug case, did not err by denying their motion to suppress evidence where the officer was justified in detaining defendants longer than it took to issue traffic citations; defendant driver had no driver's license, defendant driver was traveling cross-county with no cash or credit card, and the two defendants' stories about what they were doing differed. Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003).

Frisks and pat-down searches. —

When conducting a frisk or pat-down search, a law enforcement officer does not have to be absolutely certain an object felt on the suspect's person is a weapon prior to removing the object for inspection, so long as the officer reasonably believes that the object may be a weapon. Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996).

A law enforcement officer's seizure of hypodermic needles after discovering them during a pat-down weapons search was proper where the officer reasonably believed that what he felt on the suspect's person might have been a weapon. Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996).

Automatic companion rule. —

Wyoming has adopted the automatic companion rule, justifying pat-down searches of companions of arrested persons for the possible concealment of weapons. Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996).

Warrantless automobile searches. —

There are differences between motor vehicles and other property which permit warrantless searches of automobiles in circumstances in which warrantless searches would not be reasonable in other contexts. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Where the police had probable cause to believe not only that the occupants of the automobile were involved in the commission of the crime but that the automobile was carrying the fruits of the crime and the instruments used to accomplish it and the latter conclusion was made even more credible by the close proximity in time between the commission of the crime and the arrest, the search of the automobile at the place it was stopped was constitutionally valid. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Search of fuse box in passenger compartment of vehicle was justified as a search incident to defendant's DWI arrest, where officers observed shell casings alerting them to possible presence of a small handgun. Vasquez v. State, 990 P.2d 476,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 1999).

Court, in defendants' drug case, did not err by denying their motion to suppress evidence where defendants' consent to a search of a vehicle was voluntary and the officer's conduct in obtaining the consent was not coercive. Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003).

Supreme court determined that defendant's consent to search the vehicle in which drugs were located was voluntarily given; defendant did not submit to the will of the officers, but he instead affirmatively gave consent, and the number of officers present at the scene and the presence of police dogs were reasonable under the circumstances. Guzman v. State, 2003 WY 118, 76 P.3d 825,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2003).

Where a search of a vehicle defendant was driving was incident to a lawful arrest and reasonable under all the circumstances because of officer safety concerns, the search did not violate Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4. Even though defendant had been arrested and was secure inside the patrol car, the presence of a box, the contents of which were unknown, as well as an intoxicated passenger in the vehicle, presented officer safety concerns.
Clark v. State, 2006 WY 88, 138 P.3d 677,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2006).

District court erred in refusing to suppress drug-related evidence which was seized during a vehicle search incident to appellant's arrest for two traffic violations--driving under suspension and failing to maintain liability insurance--because there was no reasonable basis, articulable from the totality of the circumstances, to justify the search, which violated Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4; with respect to the search, there was no reasonable basis for the officer to believe appellant was armed or that there were weapons in the vehicle, and the “pat down” search of appellant's person did not uncover any weapons. By the officer's own account, he and appellant engaged in a friendly conversation, appellant was honest about his suspended license, he seemingly offered a reasonable explanation for his presence at the park where he was arrested, and he cooperated with the officer and did not resist arrest or become combative; as such, the State did not meet its burden to prove that the search-incident-to arrest exception applied.
Pierce v. State, 2007 WY 182, 171 P.3d 525,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 2007).

Warrantless search proper. —

It was permissible to search without a warrant based upon reasonable cause to belief that the evidence of the theft could be found in defendant's vehicle. Callaway v. State, 954 P.2d 1365,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1998).

Warrantless search of stolen vehicle, and containers within, proper. —

It was proper for the police to conduct a warrantless search and seizure of a vehicle, including any closed containers found within, which they knew to be stolen. Hunter v. State, 704 P.2d 713,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 529

(Wyo. 1985).

Probable cause for warrantless automobile search. —

Although a warrantless search of an automobile may be legal without an arrest, the basis for the probable cause for such search may be the same as that for probable cause for an arrest without a warrant. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Car was properly searched when it was stopped since at the time of the stop there was probable cause to search and it was a fleeting target for a search. Gronski v. State, 910 P.2d 561,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1996).

Probable cause supported warrantless search of defendant's car where informant told police that the defendant had marijuana in his car, and although informant was intoxicated and expressed hostility toward defendant, her report was corroborated by police officer's observations and independent determination that defendant was the subject of other criminal investigations and had an extensive criminal record. Borgwardt v. State, 946 P.2d 805,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1997).

Warrantless search of impounded vehicle. —

An inventory search of an impounded automobile is not unreasonable when it is conducted pursuant to standardized police procedure, whether or not such procedures are in writing. Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996).

Inventory search of impounded vehicle. —
